Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.340

Adverse change in contract status of certificated employee, including nonrenewal of contract—Appeal from—Scope.

Any appeal to the superior court by an employee shall be heard by the superior court without a jury. Such appeal shall be heard expeditiously. The superior court's review shall be confined to the verbatim transcript of the hearing and the papers and exhibits admitted into evidence at the hearing, except that in cases of alleged irregularities in procedure not shown in the transcript or exhibits and in cases of alleged abridgment of the employee's constitutional free speech rights, the court may take additional testimony on the alleged procedural irregularities or abridgment of free speech rights. The court shall hear oral argument and receive written briefs offered by the parties.

The court may affirm the decision of the board or hearing officer or remand the case for further proceedings; or it may reverse the decision if the substantial rights of the employee may have been prejudiced because the decision was:

(1) In violation of constitutional provisions; or

(2) In excess of the statutory authority or jurisdiction of the board or hearing officer; or

(3) Made upon unlawful procedure; or

(4) Affected by other error of law; or

(5) Clearly erroneous in view of the entire record as submitted and the public policy contained in the act of the legislature authorizing the decision or order; or

(6) Arbitrary or capricious.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114 s 6; 1969 ex.s. c 34 s 15; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.58.480. Prior: 1961 c 241 s 5. Formerly RCW 28A.58.480, 28.58.480.]

NOTES:

Savings—Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 114: See notes following RCW 28A.400.010.